Massachusetts, session 194th, H3019.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section one of Chapter 63A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting in line 9
after the words “veterans organizations” the following phrase:— “or other fraternal
organization”.
Chapter 63A of the General Laws is hereby further amended by inserting the following
section:—
Section 6. Section 2 shall not apply to sales of alcoholic beverages made to members of
the organization and their guests if such beverages are served in a lounge or similar area which is
reserved for the exclusive use of such members and guests and which is not otherwise available
for use or hire by the general public. Said section 2 shall also not be effective when sales of
of 2

alcoholic beverages are made at special events, gatherings, dinners and ceremonies of the
organization if such sales are made in a lounge or similar area that is ordinarily available for use
or hire by the general public; provided that the only attendees are members and their duly
qualified guests.
of 2